Nebraska, session 109, LB979.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 37-201, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
37-201 Sections 37-201 to 37-814 and 37-1501 to 37-1510 and sections 6 and
20 of this act and the State Park System Construction Alternatives Act shall be
known and may be cited as the Game Law.
Sec. 2. Section 37-247.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
37-247.01 Wildlife abatement means the use of a trained raptor to
frighten, flush, haze, take, or kill certain wildlife to manage depredation,
damage, or other threats to human health and safety or commerce caused by such
wildlife.
Sec. 3. Section 37-324, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
37-324 (1) The funds derived from the sale of permits and publications as
provided in the Game Law, any unexpended balance now on hand from the sale of
hunting, fur-harvesting, and fishing permits, and all money required by the
Game Law to be paid into the State Game Fund are hereby appropriated to the use
of the commission (a) for the propagation, importation, protection,
preservation, and distribution of game and fish and necessary equipment
therefor and all things pertaining thereto, (b) for the creation of cash funds
under section 37-326, (c) for the administration and enforcement of the State
Boat Act, (d) for boating safety educational programs, (e) for the construction
and maintenance of boating and docking facilities, navigation aids, and access
to boating areas and such other uses which will promote the safety and
convenience of the boating public in Nebraska, (f) for abatement payment of
claims by landowners in Nebraska for property damage caused by deer, antelope,
or elk , if such payment is in compliance with federal laws and regulations,
and (g) for publishing costs for publications relating to topics listed in
subdivisions (a) and (b) of this subsection and other topics of general
interest to the state as approved by the commission. An amount equal to two
dollars from each annual resident fishing permit and two dollars from each
combination hunting and fishing permit sold in this state shall be used by the
commission for the administration, construction, operation, and maintenance of
fish hatcheries and for the distribution of fish.
(2) Expenditures for publications on topics of general interest to the
state shall not exceed the income derived from single-copy and subscription
sales of commission publications and advertising revenue from such
publications.
Sec. 4. Section 37-327.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
37-327.01 (1) The Game Law Investigation Cash Fund is created. The
commission shall use the fund for investigations to enforce the purpose of
obtaining evidence for enforcement of the Game Law. The fund shall be funded
through revenue collected under the Game Law and budgeted or allocated to the
fund by the commission, and through donations from persons, wildlife groups,
and other charitable sources. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) For the purpose of establishing and maintaining legislative oversight
and accountability, the commission shall formulate record-keeping procedures
for all expenditures, disbursements, and transfers of cash from the Game Law
Investigation Cash Fund. Based on these record-keeping procedures, the
commission shall prepare and deliver electronically to the Clerk of the
Legislature by September 15 of each year a detailed report of the previous
fiscal year which includes, but is not limited to:
(a) The June 30 balance in the Game Law Investigation Cash Fund and the
amounts delivered to the commission for distribution to agents and informants;
(b) The the total amount of expenditures;
(c) The the purpose of the expenditures including: (i) Salaries and any
expenses of all agents and informants; (ii) front money for wildlife purchases;
(iii) type of wildlife and amount purchased; and (iv) amount of front money
-1-

LB979 LB979
2026 2026
recovered; (v) investigative vehicles and specialized investigatory equipment;
(vi) digital investigative services; and (vii) specialized investigative
training;
(d) The the total number of informants on payroll; and
(e) The the results procured through such transactions. Each member of the
Legislature shall receive an electronic copy of such report by making a request
for it to the secretary of the commission.
(3) The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this section.
Sec. 5. Section 37-327.04, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is amended
to read:
37-327.04 The Game and Parks Commission Educational Fund is created. The
fund shall consist of money credited pursuant to section 60-3,163.02 and
section 6 of this act, any gifts, grants, bequests, or other contributions to
such fund, and any other money as determined by the Legislature. The commission
shall use the fund to provide youth education programs relating to wildlife
conservation practices. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 6. The commission may establish and collect reasonable fees for
providing programs relating to fish and wildlife education. Fees for providing
such programs shall not exceed the costs of staffing and materials for such
programs. The proceeds of all such fees shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the Game and Parks Commission Educational Fund.
Sec. 7. Section 37-406, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
37-406 (1) Licenses, permits, and stamps required under the Game Law shall
be issued by the commission and may be procured from the secretary of the
commission. The commission may provide for the electronic issuance of any
license, permit, or stamp required under the Game Law and may enter into
contracts to procure necessary services and supplies for the electronic
issuance of licenses, permits, and stamps. Except for permits issued under
sections 37-462 and 37-463, the commission may provide for the issuance of any
license, permit, or stamp required under the Game Law in the form of a number
which identifies the holder in the records of the commission. The commission
may designate itself and other persons, firms, and corporations as agents to
issue licenses, permits, and stamps and collect the prescribed fees. The
commission and any person, firm, or corporation authorized by the commission to
issue licenses, permits, and stamps shall be entitled to collect and retain an
additional fee of not more than four three dollars, for each license, permit,
or stamp issued as reimbursement for the clerical work of issuing the license,
permit, or stamp and collecting and remitting the fees.
(2) The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
regarding electronic issuance of licenses, permits, and stamps, including
electronic issuance devices, deposits by agents, and remittance of fees. The
commission may provide for the electronic issuance of a license, permit, or
stamp by acknowledging the purchase of such license, permit, or stamp without
requiring a physical license, permit, or stamp or facsimile of such.
(3) It shall be unlawful for any person to duplicate any electronically
issued license, permit, or stamp. Any person violating this subsection shall be
guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be fined at least seventy-five
dollars, and any license, permit, or stamp involved in such violation shall be
confiscated by the court.
Sec. 8. Section 37-415, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
37-415 (1) The commission may issue to any Nebraska resident a lifetime
fur-harvesting, fishing, hunting, or combination hunting and fishing permit
upon application and payment of the appropriate fee. The fee for a resident
lifetime fur-harvesting or hunting permit shall not exceed twenty times the
annual fee for such permit, as such fees are established by the commission
pursuant to section 37-327. The fee for a resident lifetime fishing or
combination hunting and fishing permit shall not exceed twenty times the annual
fee for such permit permit shall be not more than two hundred ninety-nine
dollars, the fee for a resident lifetime hunting permit shall be not more than
three hundred ninety-six dollars, the fee for a resident lifetime fishing
permit shall be not more than four hundred fifty-seven dollars plus the cost of
a lifetime aquatic habitat stamp, and the fee for a resident lifetime
combination hunting and fishing permit shall be not more than seven hundred
ninety-two dollars plus the cost of a lifetime aquatic habitat stamp, as such
fees are established by the commission pursuant to section 37-327. Payment of
the fee shall be made in a lump sum at the time of application.
(2) A resident lifetime permit shall not be made invalid by reason of the
holder subsequently residing outside the state.
(3) The commission may issue to any nonresident a lifetime fishing,
hunting, or combination hunting and fishing permit upon application and payment
of the appropriate fee. The fee for a nonresident lifetime hunting permit shall
not exceed twenty times the annual fee for such permit, as such fees are
established by the commission pursuant to section 37-327. The fee for a
nonresident lifetime fishing or combination hunting and fishing permit shall
not exceed twenty times the annual fee for such permit be not more than one
thousand five hundred sixty-two dollars, the fee for a nonresident lifetime
fishing permit shall be not more than one thousand one hundred twenty-five
dollars plus the cost of a lifetime aquatic habitat stamp, and the fee for a
-2-

LB979 LB979
2026 2026
nonresident lifetime combination hunting and fishing permit shall be not more
than two thousand three hundred forty-two dollars plus the cost of a lifetime
aquatic habitat stamp, as such fees are established by the commission pursuant
to section 37-327. Payment of the fee shall be made in a lump sum at the time
of application.
(4) A replacement resident or nonresident lifetime permit may be issued if
the original has been lost or destroyed for no additional fee. This subsection
applies only to a paper permit and not a commemorative brass plate permit.
(5) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry
out this section and sections 37-416 and 37-417. Such rules and regulations may
include, but need not be limited to, establishing fees which vary based on the
age of the applicant.
Sec. 9. Section 37-431, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
37-431 (1)(a) The Nebraska Habitat Fund is created. The commission shall
remit fees received for annual and multiple-year habitat stamps and annual and
multiple-year Nebraska migratory waterfowl stamps to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Nebraska Habitat Fund. Any money in the fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Fees received and income from such investments may be expended by the
commission pursuant to section 37-432. Up to twenty-five percent of the annual
receipts of the fund may be spent by the commission to provide access to
private wildlife lands and habitat areas, and the remainder of the fund shall
not be spent until the commission has presented a habitat plan to the Committee
on Appropriations of the Legislature for its approval.
(b) Fees received for lifetime habitat stamps and lifetime Nebraska
migratory waterfowl stamps under the Game Law shall be credited to the Nebraska
Habitat Fund. Twenty-five percent of the fees for such stamps shall not be
expended but may be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Income from such investments may be expended by the commission pursuant to
section 37-432.
(2)(a) The Nebraska Aquatic Habitat Fund is created. The commission shall
remit fees received for annual and multiple-year aquatic habitat stamps and one
dollar of the one-day fishing permit fee as provided in section 37-426 to the
State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Aquatic Habitat Fund. Any money in
the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State
Funds Investment Act. Fees received and income from such investments may be
expended by the commission pursuant to section 37-432. Up to thirty percent of
the annual receipts of the fund may be spent by the commission to provide
public waters angler access enhancements and to provide funding for the
administration of programs related to aquatic habitat and public waters angler
access enhancements, and the remainder of the fund shall not be spent until the
commission has presented a habitat plan to the Committee on Appropriations and
the Committee on Natural Resources of the Legislature for their approval.
(b) Fees received for lifetime aquatic habitat stamps shall be credited to
the Nebraska Aquatic Habitat Fund. Twenty-five percent of the fees for such
stamps and shall not be expended but may be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State
Funds Investment Act. Income from such investments may be expended by the
commission pursuant to section 37-432.
(3) The secretary of the commission and any county clerk or public
official designated to sell habitat stamps, aquatic habitat stamps, or Nebraska
migratory waterfowl stamps shall be liable upon their official bonds or
equivalent commercial insurance policy for failure to remit the money from the
sale of the stamps, as required by sections 37-426 to 37-433, coming into their
hands. Any agent who receives stamp fees and who fails to remit the fees to the
commission within a reasonable time after demand by the commission shall be
liable to the commission in damages for double the amount of the funds
wrongfully withheld. Any agent who purposefully fails to remit such fees with
the intention of converting them is guilty of theft. The penalty for such
violation shall be determined by the amount converted as specified in section
28-518.
Sec. 10. Section 37-447, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
37-447 (1) The commission may issue permits for the hunting of deer and
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations and pass commission orders pursuant
to section 37-314 to prescribe limitations for the hunting, transportation, and
possession of deer. The commission may offer permits or combinations of permits
at temporarily reduced rates for specific events or during specified
timeframes. The commission may specify by rule and regulation the information
to be required on applications for such permits. Rules and regulations for the
hunting, transportation, and possession of deer may include, but not be limited
to, rules and regulations as to the type, caliber, and other specifications of
firearms and ammunition used and specifications for bows and arrows used. Such
rules and regulations may further specify and limit the method of hunting deer
and may provide for dividing the state into management units or areas, and the
commission may enact different deer hunting regulations for the different
management units pertaining to sex, species, and age of the deer hunted.
(2) The number of such permits may be limited as provided by the rules and
regulations of the commission, and except as provided in section 37-454, the
-3-

LB979 LB979
2026 2026
permits shall be allocated in an impartial manner. Whenever the commission
deems it advisable to limit the number of permits issued for any or all
management units, the commission shall, by rules and regulations, determine
eligibility to obtain such permits. In establishing eligibility, the commission
may give preference to persons who did not receive a permit or a specified type
of permit during the previous year or years.
(3) Such permits may be issued to allow deer hunting in the Nebraska
National Forest and other game reserves and such other areas as the commission
may designate whenever the commission deems that permitting such hunting will
not be detrimental to the proper preservation of wildlife in Nebraska in such
forest, reserves, or areas.
(4)(a) The commission may, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and
charge a nonrefundable application fee of not more than nine seven dollars for
deer permits in those management units awarded on the basis of a random
drawing. The commission shall, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge
a fee of not more than fifty thirty-nine dollars for residents and not more
than four hundred eighty three hundred sixty-nine dollars for nonresidents for
each permit issued under this section except as otherwise provided in
subdivision (b) of this subsection and subsection (6) of this section. The
commission may, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge a fee of not
more than twenty-four dollars for residents and not more than seventy-two
dollars for nonresidents for the issuance of a preference point, in addition to
any application fee. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations for issuing a preference point , in lieu of entering the draw for a
deer permit during the application period for the random drawing.
(b) The fee for a statewide buck-only permit limited to white-tailed deer
shall be no more than two and one-half times the amount of a regular deer
permit. The fee for a statewide buck-only deer permit that allows harvest of
mule deer shall be no more than five times the amount of a regular deer permit.
(5)(a) The commission may issue nonresident permits after preference has
been given for the issuance of resident permits as provided in rules and
regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission.
(b) In management units specified by the commission, the commission may
issue nonresident permits after resident preference has been provided by
allocating at least eighty-five percent of the available permits to residents.
The commission may require a predetermined application period for permit
applications in specified management units. Such permits shall be issued after
a reasonable period for making application, as established by the commission,
has expired. When more valid applications are received for a designated
management unit than there are permits available, such permits shall be
allocated on the basis of a random drawing. All valid applications received
during the predetermined application period shall be considered equally in any
such random drawing without regard to time of receipt of such applications by
the commission.
(6) The commission shall, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge
a fee of not more than twenty-five dollars for residents and not more than
forty-five dollars for nonresidents for a youth deer permit.
(7) Any person violating the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
or commission orders passed pursuant to this section shall be guilty of a Class
II misdemeanor and shall be fined at least one hundred dollars upon conviction.
Sec. 11. Section 37-449, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
37-449 (1) The commission may issue permits for hunting antelope and may
adopt and promulgate separate and, when necessary, different rules and
regulations therefor within the limitations prescribed in sections 37-447 and
37-452 for hunting deer. The commission may offer permits or combinations of
permits at reduced rates for specific events or during specified timeframes.
(2) The commission may, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge a
nonrefundable application fee of not more than nine seven dollars for antelope
permits in those management units awarded on the basis of a random drawing. The
commission shall, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge a fee of not
more than fifty thirty-nine dollars for residents and not less than three
hundred sixty-nine dollars and not more than four hundred eighty not more than
two hundred fifty-seven dollars for nonresidents for each permit issued under
this section except as provided in subsection (4) of this section. The
commission may, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge a fee of not
more than twenty-four dollars for residents and not more than seventy-two
dollars for nonresidents for the issuance of a preference point, in addition to
any application fee. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations for issuing a preference point , in lieu of entering the draw for
an antelope permit during the application period for the random drawing.
(3) The provisions for the distribution of deer permits and the authority
of the commission to determine eligibility of applicants for permits as
described in sections 37-447 and 37-452 shall also apply to the distribution of
antelope permits.
(4) The commission shall, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge
a fee of not more than twenty-five dollars for residents and not more than
forty-five dollars for nonresidents for a youth antelope permit.
(5) Any person violating the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
pursuant to this section shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor and shall be
fined at least one hundred dollars upon conviction.
Sec. 12. Section 37-450, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
-4-

LB979 LB979
2026 2026
37-450 (1) The commission may issue permits for hunting elk and may adopt
and promulgate separate and, when necessary, different rules and regulations
therefor within the limitations prescribed in sections 37-447 and 37-452 for
hunting deer.
(2) The commission shall, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge
(a) a nonrefundable application fee of not more than twelve dollars for a
resident elk permit and not to exceed three times such amount for a nonresident
elk permit and (b) a fee of not more than one hundred ninety-eight dollars for
each resident elk permit issued and three times such amount for each
nonresident elk permit issued. The commission may, pursuant to section 37-327,
establish and charge a fee of not more than twenty-four dollars for residents
and not more than seventy-two dollars for nonresidents for the issuance of a
preference point or a bonus point, in addition to any application fee. The
commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for issuing a
preference point or bonus point , in lieu of entering the draw for an elk
permit during the application period for the random drawing.
(3) An applicant shall not be issued a resident elk permit that allows the
harvest of an antlered elk more than once every five years. A person may only
harvest one antlered elk in his or her lifetime except when harvesting an
antlered elk with a limited permit to hunt elk pursuant to subdivision (1)(b)
of section 37-455 or an auction or lottery permit pursuant to section
37-455.01.
(4) The provisions for the distribution of deer permits and the authority
of the commission to determine eligibility of applicants for permits as
described in sections 37-447 and 37-452 shall also apply to the distribution of
elk permits.
(5) Any person violating the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
pursuant to this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall
be fined at least two hundred dollars upon conviction.
Sec. 13. Section 37-451, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is amended to
read:
37-451 (1) The commission may issue permits for hunting mountain sheep and
may adopt and promulgate separate and, when necessary, different rules and
regulations therefor within the limitations prescribed in subsection (1) of
section 37-447 and section 37-452 for hunting deer. Such rules and regulations
shall include provisions allowing persons who find dead mountain sheep, or any
part of a mountain sheep, to turn over to the commission such mountain sheep or
part of a mountain sheep. The commission may dispose of such mountain sheep or
part of a mountain sheep as it deems reasonable and prudent. Except as
otherwise provided in this section, the permits shall be issued to residents of
Nebraska.
(2) The commission shall, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge
a nonrefundable application fee of not more than forty-four thirty-four dollars
for permits issued only to residents. Any number of resident-only permits, as
authorized by the commission, shall be awarded by random drawing to eligible
applicants. No permit fee shall be charged in addition to the nonrefundable
application fee.
(3) No more than two additional permits may be authorized and issued
pursuant to an auction open to residents and nonresidents. The number of such
permits shall not exceed the number of those awarded pursuant to subsection (2)
of this section. The auction shall be conducted according to rules and
regulations prescribed by the commission. Any money derived from the sale of
permits by auction shall be used only for perpetuation and management of
mountain sheep, elk, and deer.
(4) If the commission determines to limit the number of permits issued for
any or all management units, the commission shall by rule and regulation
determine eligibility requirements for the permits.
(5) A person may obtain only one mountain sheep permit in his or her
lifetime, except that an auction permit issued in accordance with subsection
(3) of this section to harvest a mountain sheep shall not count against such
total.
(6) Any person violating the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
pursuant to this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall
be fined at least five hundred dollars upon conviction.
Sec. 14. Section 37-455, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is amended to
read:
37-455 (1) The commission may issue a limited permit for deer, antelope,
wild turkey, or elk, or mountain lion to a person who is a qualifying landowner
or leaseholder or a member of such person's immediate family as described in
this section. The commission may issue nonresident landowner limited permits
after preference has been given for the issuance of resident permits as
provided in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission.
Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a permit shall be valid
during the predetermined period established by the commission pursuant to
sections 37-447 to 37-450, 37-452, 37-456, or 37-457. Upon receipt of an
application in proper form as prescribed by the rules and regulations of the
commission, the commission may issue (a) a limited deer, antelope, or wild
turkey permit valid for hunting on all of the land which is owned or leased by
the qualifying landowner or leaseholder if such lands are identified in the
application or (b) a limited elk or mountain lion permit valid for hunting on
the entire elk or mountain lion management unit of which the land of the
qualifying landowner or leaseholder included in the application is a part.
(2)(a) The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
-5-

LB979 LB979
2026 2026
prescribing procedures and forms and create requirements for documentation by
an applicant or permittee to determine whether the applicant or permittee is a
Nebraska resident and is a qualifying landowner or leaseholder of the described
property or is a member of the immediate family of such qualifying landowner or
leaseholder. The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations that
create requirements for documentation to designate one qualifying landowner
among partners of a partnership or officers or shareholders of a corporation
that owns or leases eighty acres or more of farm or ranch land for agricultural
purposes and among beneficiaries of a trust that owns or leases eighty acres or
more of farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes. Only a person who is a
qualifying landowner or leaseholder or a member of such person's immediate
family may apply for a limited permit. An applicant may apply for no more than
one permit per species per year except as otherwise provided in subsection (4)
of this section and the rules and regulations of the commission. For purposes
of this section, member of a person's immediate family means and is limited to
the spouse of such person, any child or stepchild of such person or of the
spouse of such person, any spouse of any such child or stepchild, any
grandchild or stepgrandchild of such person or of the spouse of such person,
any spouse of such grandchild or stepgrandchild, any sibling of such person
sharing ownership in the property, and any spouse of any such sibling.
(b) The conditions applicable to permits issued pursuant to sections
37-447 to 37-450, 37-452, 37-456, or 37-457, whichever is appropriate, shall
apply to limited permits issued pursuant to this section, except that the
commission may pass commission orders for species harvest allocation pertaining
to the sex and age of the species harvested which are different for a limited
permit than for other hunting permits. For purposes of this section, white-
tailed deer and mule deer shall be treated as one species.
(3)(a) To qualify for a limited permit to hunt deer or antelope, the
applicant shall be a Nebraska resident who (i) owns or leases eighty acres or
more of farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes or a member of such
person's immediate family or (ii) is the partner, officer, shareholder, or
beneficiary designated as the qualifying landowner by a partnership,
corporation, or trust as provided in the rules and regulations under
subdivision (2)(a) of this section or a member of the immediate family of the
partner, officer, shareholder, or beneficiary. The number of limited permits
issued annually per species for each farm or ranch shall not exceed the total
acreage of the farm or ranch divided by eighty. The fee for a limited permit to
hunt deer or antelope shall be one-half the fee for the regular permit for such
species.
(b) A nonresident of Nebraska who owns three hundred twenty acres or more
of farm or ranch land in the State of Nebraska for agricultural purposes or a
member of such person's immediate family may apply for a limited deer or
antelope permit. The number of limited permits issued annually per species for
each farm or ranch shall not exceed the total acreage of the farm or ranch
divided by three hundred twenty. The fee for such a permit to hunt deer or
antelope shall be one-half the fee for a nonresident permit to hunt such
species.
(c) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
providing for the issuance of an additional limited deer permit to a qualified
individual for the taking of a deer without antlers at a fee equal to or less
than the fee for the original limited permit.
(4)(a) In addition to any limited permit to hunt deer issued to a
qualifying landowner under subsection (3) of this section, the commission shall
issue up to eight limited permits to hunt deer during the three days of
Saturday through Monday immediately preceding the opening day of firearm deer
hunting season to any qualifying landowner meeting the requirements of
subdivision (b) of this subsection and designated members of his or her
immediate family. The fee for each permit issued under this subsection shall be
five dollars. Permits shall be issued subject to the following:
(i) No more than eight permits may be issued per qualifying landowner to
the landowner or designated members of his or her immediate family, except that
no more than one permit shall be issued per person for the qualifying landowner
or any designated member of his or her immediate family;
(ii) Of the eight permits that may be issued, no more than six permits may
be issued to persons who are younger than nineteen years of age and no more
than two permits may be issued to persons who are nineteen years of age or
older; and
(iii) For a Nebraska resident landowner, the number of permits issued
shall not exceed the total acreage of the farm or ranch divided by eighty, and
for a nonresident landowner, the number of permits issued shall not exceed the
total acreage of the farm or ranch divided by three hundred twenty.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the qualifying criteria for a
Nebraska resident described in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section
and the ownership criteria for a nonresident of Nebraska described in
subdivision (3)(b) of this section apply.
(c) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry
out this subsection.
(5)(a) To qualify for a limited permit to hunt wild turkey, the applicant
shall be a Nebraska resident who (i) owns or leases eighty acres or more of
farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes or a member of such person's
immediate family or (ii) is the partner, officer, shareholder, or beneficiary
designated as the qualifying landowner by a partnership, corporation, or trust
as provided in the rules and regulations under subdivision (2)(a) of this
-6-

LB979 LB979
2026 2026
section or a member of the immediate family of the partner, officer,
shareholder, or beneficiary. The number of limited permits issued annually per
season for each farm or ranch shall not exceed the total acreage of the farm or
ranch divided by eighty. An applicant may apply for no more than one limited
permit per season. The fee for a limited permit to hunt wild turkey shall be
one-half the fee for the regular permit to hunt wild turkey.
(b) A nonresident of Nebraska who owns three hundred twenty acres or more
of farm or ranch land in the State of Nebraska for agricultural purposes or a
member of such person's immediate family may apply for a limited permit to hunt
wild turkey. Only one limited wild turkey permit per three hundred twenty acres
may be issued annually for each wild turkey season under this subdivision. The
fee for such a permit to hunt shall be one-half the fee for a nonresident
permit to hunt wild turkey.
(6)(a) To qualify for a limited permit to hunt elk, (i) the applicant
shall be (A) a Nebraska resident who owns three hundred twenty acres or more of
farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes, or is the partner, officer,
shareholder, or beneficiary designated as the qualifying landowner by a
partnership, corporation, or trust as provided in the rules and regulations
under subdivision (2)(a) of this section, (B) a Nebraska resident who leases
six hundred forty acres or more of farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes
or has a combined total of six hundred forty leased and owned acres of farm or
ranch land used for agricultural purposes, or is the partner, officer,
shareholder, or beneficiary designated as the qualifying landowner by a
partnership, corporation, or trust as provided in the rules and regulations
under subdivision (2)(a) of this section, (C) a nonresident of Nebraska who
owns at least one thousand two hundred eighty acres of farm or ranch land for
agricultural purposes, or is the partner, officer, shareholder, or beneficiary
designated as the qualifying landowner by a partnership, corporation, or trust
as provided in the rules and regulations under subdivision (2)(a) of this
section, or (D) a member of such owner's or lessee's immediate family and (ii)
the qualifying farm or ranch land of the applicant shall be within an area
designated as an elk management zone by the commission in its rules and
regulations.
(b) An applicant shall not be issued a limited bull elk permit more than
once every three years, and the commission may give preference to a person who
did not receive a limited elk permit or a specified type of limited elk permit
during the previous years.
(c) The fee for a resident landowner limited permit to hunt elk shall not
exceed one-half the fee for the regular permit to hunt elk. The fee for a
nonresident landowner limited permit to hunt elk shall not exceed three times
the cost of a resident elk permit.
(d) The number of applications allowed for limited elk permits for each
farm or ranch shall not exceed the total acreage of the farm or ranch divided
by the minimum acreage requirements established for the property. No more than
one person may qualify for the same described property.
(7)(a) To qualify for a limited permit to hunt mountain lions, (i) the
applicant shall be (A) a Nebraska resident who owns three hundred twenty acres
or more of farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes, or is the partner,
officer, shareholder, or beneficiary designated as the qualifying landowner by
a partnership, corporation, or trust as provided in the rules and regulations
under subdivision (2)(a) of this section, (B) a Nebraska resident who leases
six hundred forty acres or more of farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes
or has a combined total of six hundred forty leased and owned acres of farm or
ranch land used for agricultural purposes, or is the partner, officer,
shareholder, or beneficiary designated as the qualifying landowner by a
partnership, corporation, or trust as provided in the rules and regulations
under subdivision (2)(a) of this section, or (C) a member of such owner's or
lessee's immediate family and (ii) the qualifying farm or ranch land of the
applicant shall be within an area designated as a mountain lion management zone
by the commission in its rules and regulations.
(b) The commission may give preference to a person who did not receive a
limited mountain lion permit during the previous years.
(c) The application fee for a resident landowner limited permit to hunt
mountain lions shall not exceed one-half the application fee for the regular
permit to hunt mountain lions.
(d) The number of applications allowed for limited mountain lion permits
for each farm or ranch shall not exceed the total acreage of the farm or ranch
divided by the minimum acreage requirements established for the property. No
more than one person may qualify for the same described property.
Sec. 15. Section 37-456, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
37-456 The issuance of limited antelope permits pursuant to section 37-455
in any management unit shall not exceed seventy-five percent of the regular
permits authorized for such antelope management unit. The issuance of limited
elk permits pursuant to section 37-455 in any management unit shall not exceed
seventy-five percent of the regular permits authorized for such elk management
unit. The issuance of limited mountain lion permits pursuant to section 37-455
in any management unit shall not exceed seventy-five percent of the regular
permits authorized for such mountain lion management unit.
Sec. 16. Section 37-456.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
37-456.01 (1) The commission may issue one free-earned landowner elk
permit for the taking of either sex of elk to any person owning or leasing at
-7-

LB979 LB979
2026 2026
least eighty acres of farm or ranch land used for agricultural purposes, or to
any member of the immediate family of such person as defined in subdivision (2)
(a) of section 37-455, when the qualifying number of antlerless elk have been
harvested on such land by hunters with a permit issued under section 37-448 or
37-450. Such permit shall be limited to hunting on the lands owned or leased by
the qualifying landowner. Receipt of a free-earned landowner elk permit shall
not in any way affect a person's eligibility for a permit issued under section
37-450 or 37-455.
(2) The commission may shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
prescribing issuance of free-earned landowner elk permits, accumulation of
antlerless elk harvests, procedures, forms, and requirements for documentation
by landowners or lessees as described in subsection (1) of this section to
annually report antlerless elk harvested on their property for eligibility, and
the number of antlerless elk required to be harvested on such property to
qualify for a free-earned landowner elk permit. The number of antlerless elk
harvested to qualify shall accumulate each year until such time as a free-
earned landowner elk permit is awarded.
Sec. 17. Section 37-457, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
37-457 (1) The commission may issue permits for hunting wild turkey and
prescribe and establish regulations and limitations for the hunting,
transportation, and possession of wild turkey. The commission may offer
multiple-year permits or combinations of permits at reduced rates. The number
of such permits may be limited as provided by the regulations of the
commission, but the permits shall be disposed of in an impartial manner. Such
permits may be issued to allow wild turkey hunting in the Nebraska National
Forest and other game reserves and such other areas as the commission may
designate whenever the commission deems that permitting such hunting would not
be detrimental to the proper preservation of wildlife in such forest, reserves,
or areas.
(2) The commission may, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge a
nonrefundable application fee of not more than nine dollars for turkey permits
to be awarded on the basis of a random drawing. The commission shall, pursuant
to section 37-327, establish and charge a fee of not more than forty thirty-one
dollars for residents and not more than two one hundred fourteen sixty-four
dollars for nonresidents for each permit issued under this section except as
provided in subsection (5) of this section. The commission may, pursuant to
section 37-327, establish and charge a fee of not more than twenty-four dollars
for residents and not more than seventy-two dollars for nonresidents for the
issuance of a preference point, in addition to any application fee. The
commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the issuance of
a preference point.
(3) The commission may issue nonresident permits after preference has been
given for the issuance of resident permits as provided in rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated by the commission. The commission may require a
predetermined application period for permit applications in specified
management units.
(4) The provisions of subsection (5) of section 37-447 for the
distribution of deer permits also may apply to the distribution of wild turkey
permits. No permit to hunt wild turkey shall be issued without payment of the
fee required by this section.
(5) The commission shall, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge
a fee of not more than twenty-five dollars for residents and not more than
forty-five dollars for nonresidents for a youth wild turkey permit.
Sec. 18. Section 37-484, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
37-484 Any person or persons owning, holding, or controlling by lease or
otherwise, which possession must be for a term of five or more years, any tract
or tracts of land having an area of not less than eighty acres and not more
than two thousand five hundred sixty acres who desires to establish a game
breeding and controlled shooting area to propagate, preserve, and shoot game
birds under the regulations as provided in sections 37-484 to 37-496 shall make
application to the commission for a license as provided by such sections. Such
application shall be made under oath of the applicant or one of its principal
officers if the applicant is an association, club, or corporation and shall be
accompanied by a license fee of not more than two hundred fifty-eight one
hundred ninety-eight dollars, as established by the commission pursuant to
section 37-327. Any controlled shooting area existing on February 18, 1987,
shall continue in operation on the existing acreage until such controlled
shooting area license is not renewed or canceled. If the applicant is an
individual, the application shall include the applicant's social security
number.
Sec. 19. Section 37-4,111, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
37-4,111 The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
provide for the issuance of permits for the taking of paddlefish. The
commission may, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge a fee of not
more than thirty-five dollars for residents. The fee for a nonresident permit
to take paddlefish shall be two times the resident permit fee. In addition, the
commission may, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge a
nonrefundable application fee of not more than nine seven dollars. The
commission may, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge a fee of not
more than twenty-four dollars for residents and not more than seventy-two
-8-

LB979 LB979
2026 2026
dollars for nonresidents for the issuance of a preference point, in addition to
any application fee. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations for issuing a preference point , in lieu of applying for a
paddlefish permit during the application period. All fees collected under this
section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the State Game
Fund.
Sec. 20. It shall be unlawful for any person to possess, transport, sell,
purchase, barter, trade, import, export, or conspire to possess, transport,
sell, purchase, barter, trade, import, or export any wildlife taken, possessed,
transported, or exported in violation of the Game Law. Any person violating
this section shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
Sec. 21. Section 37-1214, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is amended to
read:
37-1214 (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 37-1211, the owner of
each motorboat shall register such vessel or renew the registration every three
years as provided in section 37-1226. The owner of such vessel shall file an
initial application for a certificate of number pursuant to section 37-1216
with a county treasurer on forms approved and provided by the commission. The
application shall be signed by the owner of the vessel, shall contain the year
manufactured, and shall be accompanied by a registration fee for the three-year
period of forty twenty-eight dollars for Class 1 boats, sixty fifty-one dollars
for Class 2 boats, eighty seventy-two dollars and fifty cents for Class 3
boats, and one hundred thirty twenty dollars for Class 4 boats. Of each
motorboat registration fee, not more than ten dollars may be used for the
Aquatic Invasive Species Program.
(2) The owner of a motorboat not registered in Nebraska shall purchase an
aquatic invasive species stamp for the Aquatic Invasive Species Program valid
for one calendar year prior to launching into any waters of the state. The cost
of such one-year stamp shall be established pursuant to section 37-327 and be
not more than thirty dollars plus an issuance fee pursuant to section 37-406.
Such one-year stamp may be purchased electronically or through any vendor
authorized by the commission to sell other permits and stamps issued under the
Game Law pursuant to section 37-406. The aquatic invasive species stamp shall
be permanently affixed on the starboard and rearward side of the vessel. The
proceeds from the sale of stamps shall be remitted to the State Game Fund.
(3) This subsection applies beginning on an implementation date designated
by the Director of Motor Vehicles in cooperation with the commission. The
director shall designate an implementation date on or before January 1, 2021,
for motorboat registration. In addition to the information required under
subsection (1) of this section, the application for registration shall contain
(a)(i) the full legal name as defined in section 60-468.01 of each owner or
(ii) the name of each owner as such name appears on the owner's motor vehicle
operator's license or state identification card and (b)(i) the motor vehicle
operator's license number or state identification card number of each owner, if
applicable, and one or more of the identification elements as listed in section
60-484 of each owner, if applicable, and (ii) if any owner is a business
entity, a nonprofit organization, an estate, a trust, or a church-controlled
organization, its tax identification number.
Sec. 22. Section 37-1241.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
37-1241.02 (1) A personal watercraft may not be operated on the waters of
this state unless each person aboard the personal watercraft is wearing a Type
I, Type II, Type III, or Type V United States Coast Guard-approved floatation
device approved for use on personal watercraft.
(2) Each person operating a personal watercraft on the waters of this
state which is equipped by the manufacturer with a lanyard-type engine cutoff
switch shall attach the lanyard to the operator's person, clothing, or
floatation device as appropriate.
Sec. 23. Original sections 37-327.01, 37-406, 37-431, 37-484, and
37-1241.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, sections 37-201, 37-247.01,
37-324, 37-415, 37-447, 37-449, 37-450, 37-456, 37-456.01, 37-457, and
37-4,111, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and sections 37-327.04,
37-451, 37-455, and 37-1214, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-9-